Arkansas, session 2025, HB1084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby
established for the Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q001U LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR 1 GRADE EXE04
(2) Q001N ASSISTANT LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR 1 GRADE EXE03
(3) Q003N DEPUTY LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR 6 GRADE EXE03
*JAR015*
04-07-2025 14:39:54 JAR015

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1084
(4) Q002N LA LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE EXE03
(5) Q006N LA AUDIT MANAGER 5 GRADE SPC11
(6) Q010N LA FIELD AUDIT SUPERVISOR 22 GRADE SPC10
(7) Q296C LA IT SECURITY OFFICER 1 GRADE IST11
(8) Q016N LA APPLICATION SYSTEMS ANALYST 2 GRADE IST09
(9) Q002C LA ASSISTANT NETWORK ADMINISTRATOR 3 GRADE IST10
(10) Q085C LA SENIOR NETWORK SERVICES SPECIALIST 2 GRADE IST06
(11) Q018N LA SENIOR AUDITOR 53 GRADE SPC08
(12) Q001C LA STAFF AUDITOR 187 GRADE SPC06
(13) Q275C LA EDITOR 1 GRADE SPC05
(14) Q022C LA ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE SGS09
(15) Q053C LA ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT 4 GRADE SGS08
(16) Q096C LA ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES SPEC 6 GRADE SGS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 296

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: ten (10) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, to
be payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $34,242,327
(02) EXTRA HELP 230,400
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 10,261,932
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
04-07-2025 14:39:54 JAR015

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1084
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 3,914,400
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 343,000
(C) PROF. FEES 760,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 200,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $49,952,059

SECTION 4. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 5. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
04-07-2025 14:39:54 JAR015

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1084
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee

































04-07-2025 14:39:54 JAR015